Illinois, session 104th, HB3077.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Department of Employment Security Law of 5the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6changing Section 1005-1 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1005/1005-1)8    Sec. 1005-1. Article short title. This Article 1005 of the 9the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois may be cited as the 10Department of Employment Security Law.11(Source: P.A. 91-239, eff. 1-1-00.)